Nevada, session 83, AB16.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Mineral County the sum of $10,000,000 for the
construction of a new county jail in Mineral County.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB16*